Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-213
Insurer, defined.

Insurer shall mean (1) an agency, department, administration, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of or in the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, the Farmers Home Administration of the United States Department of Agriculture, or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, (2) any private insurance company, or (3) any other public or private agency which insures or guarantees loans, including mortgage loans.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 17.